Utah statutes.
77-6-9.   Appeal -- Suspension from office.
From a judgment of removal an appeal may be taken to the Supreme Court in the
same manner as from a judgment in a civil action; but from entry of judgment
and until the judgment is reversed, the defendant shall be suspended from his
office. Pending the appeal, the office shall be filled as in the case of a
vacancy.
